Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3804.01
Aquaculture, defined.

Aquaculture shall mean the agricultural practice of controlled propagation and cultivation of aquatic plants or animals for commercial purposes. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term agriculture shall be construed to include aquaculture.

Laws 1987, LB 561, § 4.